Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,136
Grievance procedure.

Each health maintenance organization shall establish and maintain a grievance procedure to provide for the resolution of grievances initiated by enrollees. The procedure shall be approved by the Director of Insurance after consultation with the Department of Health and Human Services. The Director of Insurance or the department may examine the grievance procedure. The health maintenance organization shall maintain records regarding grievances received since the date of the last examination.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 45;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 250;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 189.